en: lactic and aging ferments
de: Milch- und Alterungsfermente
es: fermentos lácticos y de maduración
fr: ferment lactique et d'affinage, ferments lactiques et d'affinage
hr: mliječni i fermenti starenja
it: fermenti lattici e d'affinatura, fermenti lattici e invecchianti
nl: melk- en rijpingsfermenten
pt: fermentos lácticos e de maturação

en: selected lactic ferments
de: ausgewählte Milchsäurekulturen
es: fermentos lácticos seleccionados
fr: ferments lactiques sélectionnés
hr: odabrani mliječni fermenti
it: fermenti lattici selezionati
nl: geselecteerde melkzuurfermenten

en: bifidus, bifidus culture
bg: бифидус
ca: Bifidus, Bifidobacteri
de: Bifidus
es: bifidus, Bifidobacterium, bifidobacterias, cultivos bifidus
et: Bifidobakter
fa: بیفیدوباکتر
fi: bifidus, bifidus-viljelmä
fr: bifidus, culture de bifidus, bifidobactérium, bifidobactéries, bifidobacteries
hr: bifidobacterium, bifidobacterium BB-12
hu: bifidus, bifidusz, bifidusz kultúra, bifiduszbaktérium
it: Bifidobacterium
ja: ビフィズス菌
ka: ბიფიდობაქტერიები
kk: Бифидобактериялар
la: Bifidobacterium
nl: bifidus, Bifidobacterium
pl: bifidobacterium sp, bifidobacterium, bifidobacterium BB-12
pt: Bifidus
ru: Бифидобактерии
sv: bifidobacterium, bifidobacterium sp
tr: Bifido bakterisi
uk: Біфідобактерії
uz: Bifidobakteriyalar
vi: Vi khuẩn bifidus
zh: 雙歧桿菌屬

en: Bifidobacterium bifidum
xx: Bifidobacterium bifidum
fi: bifidobacterium bifidum, bifidobacterium sp
hr: bifidobacterium bifidum BB-12
zh: 比菲德氏菌

en: Bifidobacterium lactis, Bifidobacterium animalis, B. lactis, B. animalis
xx: Bifidobacterium lactis, B. lactis
es: Bifidobacterium lactis, Bifidobacterium animalis sp lactis
hr: bifidobacterium animalis BB-12
sv: Bifidobacterium lactis

en: Bifidobacterium longum
xx: Bifidobacterium longum
de: Bifidobacterium longum, Bifidobacterium Infantis
he: ביפידובקטריה
ko: 비피도박테리움 룽검
zh: 龍根菌

en: bifidus actiregularis, b. actiregularis
xx: bifidus actiregularis, b. actiregularis, actiregularis bifidobacterium
de: Bifidus ActiRegularis, Bifidus Kultur ActiRegularis
fr: active probiotic culture, bifidobacterium lactis cncm I-2494
hr: bifidus Actiregularis® kultura, Bifidus Actiregularis® kultura, CNCM I-2494 min 4x109/125g
ru: бифидобактерии-actiregularis, бифидобактерии actiregularis

es: bifidobacterias y otros fermentos lácticos
fr: ferments lactiques dont bifidobacterium

en: kefir ferment, kefir ferments, kefir cultures, live kefir cultures, active kefir cultures, kefir grains microflora
es: fermentos de kéfir, cultivos microbianos de kéfir, levaduras de kéfir, fermentos propios del kéfir
fr: ferments du kéfir, culture de kéfir, cultures de kéfir
hr: kefirna kultura
hu: kefirkultúra
it: coltura di kefir, fermenti di kefir, fermenti vivi di kefir
pl: kultury kefirowe, żywe kultury bakterii kefirowych, żywe kultury bakterii i drożdży kefirowych

en: kefir lactic ferment, kefir lactic ferments
es: fermentos lácticos de kéfir, fermentos lácticos de gránulos de kéfir
fr: ferments lactiques du kéfir
hr: kefir mliječni fermenti
it: fermenti lattici di kefir

en: Lactobacillus
xx: Lactobacillus
ar: عصية لبنية
be: Малочнакіслыя бактэрыі
bg: Lactobacillus, лактобацилус
ca: Lactobacil
da: Lactobacillus, Mælkesyrebakterie
el: Γαλακτοβάκιλλοι
eo: Laktobacilo
et: Laktobatsillus
fa: لاکتوباسیلوس
he: לקטובצילוס
hi: लैक्टोबैसिलस
hu: lactobacillus, tejsavbacilus
is: Mjólkursýrugerlar
it: Lactobacillus
ja: 乳酸菌
ka: ლაქტობაცილინი
ko: 젖산균
nn: laktobasillar
ro: Lactobacil
ru: Лактобациллы
te: లాక్టోబాసిల్లస్
zh: 乳桿菌屬

en: Lactobacillus acidophilus, L. acidophilus
xx: Lactobacillus acidophilus, L. acidophilus
ar: عصية لبنية حمضية
fa: لاکنوباسیلوس اسیدوفیلوس
hr: Lactobacillus acidophilus La-5, kultura Lactobacillus acidophilus, mikrobiološke kulture Lactobacillus acidophilus La-5, mljekarska kultura s Lactobacillus acidophilus
hy: թթվասեր լակտոբացիլներ
kk: Ацидофилин таяқшасы, اتسىيدوفىيلىين تاياقشاسى, Acïdofïlïn tayaqşası
pl: bakterie Lactobacillus acidophilus, bakterie Lactobacillus acidophilus LA-5, Lactobacillus acidophilus LA-5
ro: Lapte acidofil
ru: Lactobacillus acidophilus, Ацидофильная палочка
sv: Lactobacillus acidophilus, kultur av Lactobacillus acidophilus, Lactobacillus acidofilus
zh: 嗜酸乳酸杆菌, 嗜酸乳酸桿菌, 嗜酸乳桿菌

en: Lactobacillus bulgaricus, L. bulgaricus, Lactobacillus delbrueckii subsp. bulgaricus, L. delbrueckii subsp. bulgaricus
xx: Lactobacillus bulgaricus, L. bulgaricus, Lactobacillus delbrueckii ssp. bulgaricus, Lactobacillus delbruecki ssp. bulgaricus, L. delbrueckii ssp. bulgaricus
bg: Лактобацилус булгарикус, Lactobacillus bulgaricus, Lactobacillus delbrueckii subsp. bulgaricus, L. delbrueckii subsp. bulgaricus, Lactobacillus delbrueskii subsp. bulgaricus
es: lactobacilus delbrueckii sp Bulgaricus, Lactobacillus delbrueckii subspecies bulgaricus
fr: L bulgaricus, bulgaricus
it: Lactobacillus bulgaricus, L. bulgaricus
sv: Lactobacillus bulgaricus, L. bulgaricus

en: lactobacillus casei, L. casei
xx: lactobacillus casei, L. casei
ar: ملبنة مجبنة
hr: kultura lactobacillus casei
it: lactobacillus casei, L. casei
ko: 락토바실러스 카제이
zh: 乾酪乳酸桿菌

hr: l.casei 431
it: L.casei 431

en: Lactobacillus Helveticus, L. Helveticus
xx: Lactobacillus Helveticus, L. Helveticus
bg: Lactobacillus Helveticus, L. Helveticus
it: Lactobacillus Helveticus, L. Helveticus

en: Lactobacillus lactis, L. lactis, Lactobacillus delbrueckii, Lactobacillus delbrueckii subsp. lactis, L. delbrueckii subsp. lactis
xx: Lactobacillus lactis
bg: Lactobacillus lactis, L. lactis, Lactobacillus delbrueckii, Lactobacillus delbrueckii subsp. lactis, L. delbrueckii subsp. lactis
it: Lactobacillus lactis, L. lactis

en: Lactobacillus reuteri, L. reuteri
xx: Lactobacillus reuteri
bg: Lactobacillus reuteri, L. reuteri
it: Lactobacillus reuteri, L. reuteri
ja: ラクトバチルス・ロイテリ菌
zh: 羅伊乳桿菌

en: Lactobacillus rhamnosus
xx: Lactobacillus rhamnosus
hr: kultura lactobacillus rhamnosus
it: Lactobacillus rhamnosus, L. rhamnosus
ja: ラクトバチルスラムノーザス
ko: 락토바실러스

en: Lactobacillus rhamnosus GG
xx: Lactobacillus rhamnosus GG, LGG
hr: kultura Lactobacillus rhamnosus LGG, Lactobacillus rhamnosus Gorbach & Goldin ATCC 53103, Lactobacillus rhamnosus gorbach i goldin ATCC 53103